Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3715
Motor club service contract; required contents.

No motor club service contract shall be issued or delivered in this state unless it contains all of the following:

(1) The exact corporate or other name of the club;

(2) The exact location of its home office or any business office to which inquiries may be made;

(3) The motor club services contracted for;

(4) The territory wherein motor club services contracted for are to be rendered; and

(5) The duration of such motor club service contract.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 15.